Illinois, session 104th, HB5159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $100,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the 6State-Authorized Charter School Fund to the State Board of 7Education for equal distribution among charter schools 8authorized by the State Board of Education for school 9expenses. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.